Illinois, session 104th, HB4220.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-601 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-601)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-601)7    Sec. 11-601. General speed restrictions. 8    (a) No vehicle may be driven upon any highway of this State 9at a speed which is greater than is reasonable and proper with 10regard to traffic conditions and the use of the highway, or 11endangers the safety of any person or property. The fact that 12the speed of a vehicle does not exceed the applicable maximum 13speed limit does not relieve the driver from the duty to 14decrease speed when approaching and crossing an intersection, 15approaching and going around a curve, when approaching a hill 16crest, when traveling upon any narrow or winding roadway, or 17when special hazard exists with respect to pedestrians or 18other traffic or by reason of weather or highway conditions. 19Speed must be decreased as may be necessary to avoid colliding 20with any person or vehicle on or entering the highway in 21compliance with legal requirements and the duty of all persons 22to use due care.23    (a-5) For purposes of this Section, "urban district" does   HB4220- 2 -LRB104 16503 LNS 29899 b1not include any interstate highway as defined by Section 21-133.1 of this Code which includes all highways under the 3jurisdiction of the Illinois State Toll Highway Authority. 4    (b) No person may drive a vehicle upon any highway of this 5State at a speed which is greater than the applicable 6statutory maximum speed limit established by paragraphs (c), 7(d), (e), (f) or (g) of this Section, by Section 11-605 or by a 8regulation or ordinance made under this Chapter.9    (c) Unless some other speed restriction is established 10under this Chapter, the maximum speed limit in an urban 11district for all vehicles is:12        1. 30 miles per hour; and13        2. 15 miles per hour in an alley.14    (d) Unless some other speed restriction is established 15under this Chapter, the maximum speed limit outside an urban 16district for any vehicle is (1) 65 miles per hour for all or 17part of highways that are designated by the Department, have 18at least 4 lanes of traffic, and have a separation between the 19roadways moving in opposite directions and (2) 55 miles per 20hour for all other highways, roads, and streets.21    (d-1) Unless some other speed restriction is established 22under this Chapter, the maximum speed limit outside an urban 23district for any vehicle is (1) 70 miles per hour on any 24interstate highway as defined by Section 1-133.1 of this Code 25which includes all highways under the jurisdiction of the 26Illinois State Toll Highway Authority; (2) 65 miles per hour   HB4220- 3 -LRB104 16503 LNS 29899 b1for all or part of highways that are designated by the 2Department, have at least 4 lanes of traffic, and have a 3separation between the roadways moving in opposite directions; 4and (3) 55 miles per hour for all other highways, roads, and 5streets. The counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, Madison, 6McHenry, St. Clair, and Will may adopt ordinances setting a 7maximum speed limit on highways, roads, and streets that is 8lower than the limits established by this Section. 9    (e) In the counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, 10and Will, unless some lesser speed restriction is established 11under this Chapter, the maximum speed limit outside an urban 12district for a second division vehicle designed or used for 13the carrying of a gross weight of 8,001 pounds or more 14(including the weight of the vehicle and maximum load) is 60 15miles per hour on any interstate highway as defined by Section 161-133.1 of this Code and 55 miles per hour on all other 17highways, roads, and streets.18    (e-1) (Blank). 19    (e-2) Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, the 20maximum speed limit on bicycle paths for bicycles, low-speed 21electric bicycles, low-speed gas bicycles, motor driven 22cycles, and mopeds is 15 miles per hour. 23    (f) Unless some other speed restriction is established 24under this Chapter, the maximum speed limit outside an urban 25district for a bus is:26        1. 65 miles per hour upon any highway which has at   HB4220- 4 -LRB104 16503 LNS 29899 b1    least 4 lanes of traffic and of which the roadways for 2    traffic moving in opposite directions are separated by a 3    strip of ground which is not surfaced or suitable for 4    vehicular traffic, except that the maximum speed limit for 5    a bus on all highways, roads, or streets not under the 6    jurisdiction of the Department or the Illinois State Toll 7    Highway Authority is 55 miles per hour;8        1.5. 70 miles per hour upon any interstate highway as 9    defined by Section 1-133.1 of this Code outside the 10    counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will; 11    and12        2. 55 miles per hour on any other highway.13    (g) (Blank). 14(Source: P.A. 98-511, eff. 1-1-14; 98-1126, eff. 1-1-15; 1598-1128, eff. 1-1-15; 99-78, eff. 7-20-15.)